Idaho, session 2025, S1171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-8807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8807. CIVIL CAUSES OF ACTION. (1) Any female upon whom an abortion
has been attempted or performed, the father of the preborn child, a grandpar-
ent of the preborn child, a sibling of the preborn child, or an aunt or uncle
of the preborn child may maintain an action for:
(a) All damages from the medical professionals who knowingly or reck-
lessly attempted, performed, or induced the abortion in violation of
this chapter;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, statutory damages in an
amount not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) from the medical
professionals who knowingly or recklessly attempted, performed, or in-
duced an abortion in violation of this chapter; and
(c) Costs and attorney's fees.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may bring an
action under this section not later than four (4) years following the date
the cause of action accrues.
(3) No later than sixty (60) days after a defendant is served with a com-
plaint or other pleading that asserts a cause of action under this section,
or at a later time on a showing of good cause, the defendant may file a special
motion for expedited dismissal regarding the cause of action.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (d) through (g) of
this subsection, upon the filing of a motion pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section, all other proceedings between the plaintiff and the de-
fendant, including discovery and a pending hearing or motion, shall be
stayed.
(b) A stay issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall re-
main in effect until entry of an order ruling on the motion pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section or expiration of the time for the moving
party to appeal the order pursuant to subsection (9) of this section,
per applicable court rule.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of this
subsection, if a party appeals an order ruling on a motion pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, all proceedings between all parties in


the action shall be stayed. The stay shall remain in effect until the
conclusion of the appeal.
(d) During a stay issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the court may allow limited discovery if a party shows that specific
information is necessary to establish whether a party has satisfied or
failed to satisfy a burden pursuant to subsection (7) of this section
and the information is not reasonably available unless discovery is
allowed.
(e) A motion pursuant to subsection (10) of this section for costs, at-
torney's fees, and expenses shall not be subject to a stay pursuant to
this subsection.
(f) A stay issued pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall
not affect a party's ability to voluntarily dismiss a cause of action or
part of a cause of action.
(g) During a stay issued pursuant to the provisions of this subsection,
the court for good cause may hear and rule on a motion unrelated to the
motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) The court shall hear a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section no later than sixty (60) days after filing of the motion, unless
the court orders a later hearing:
(i) To allow discovery pursuant to subsection (4)(d) of this sec-
tion; or
(ii) For other good cause.
(b) If the court orders a later hearing pursuant to paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the court shall hear the motion pursuant to subsection
(4) of this section no later than sixty (60) days after the court or-
der allowing the discovery, unless the court orders a later hearing pur-
suant to paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(6) In ruling on a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section,
the court shall consider the pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to
the motion, and any evidence that could be considered in ruling on a motion
for summary judgment pursuant to applicable court rule.
(7)(a) In ruling on a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section,
the court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause of action or part of a
cause of action if:
(i) The responding party fails to establish a prima facie case as
to each essential element of the cause of action; or
(ii) The moving party establishes that the responding party
failed to state a cause of action upon which relief can be granted.
(b) A voluntary dismissal with or without prejudice of a responding
party's cause of action or part of a cause of action that is the subject
of a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall not affect a
moving party's right to obtain a ruling on the motion and to seek costs,
attorney's fees, and expenses pursuant to subsection (10) of this sec-
tion.
(8) The court shall rule on a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section no later than sixty (60) days after a hearing held pursuant to sub-
section (5) of this section.
(9) A moving party may appeal as a matter of right from an order deny-
ing, in whole or in part, a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.


The appeal shall be filed within forty-two (42) days after entry of the order
pursuant to applicable court rule.
(10) Upon a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the court
shall award court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and reasonable litiga-
tion expenses incurred in pursuing or responding to the motion to the pre-
vailing party.
(3) (11) Notwithstanding Except as provided in subsection (10) of this
section and notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter
1, title 12, Idaho Code, a court may not award costs or attorney's fees to a
defendant in an action brought under this section unless the defendant has
complied with the applicable requirements of sections 18-8803 and 18-8804,
Idaho Code.
(4) (12) The civil causes of action provided for in this section exist
independently of any criminal action commenced pursuant to this chapter. A
civil cause of action may be pursued under the provisions of this chapter
even if a criminal prosecution is not pursued.
(5) (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chap-
ters 14, 17, and 18, title 54, Idaho Code, the requirements of this section
shall be enforced exclusively through the private civil causes of action
described. No enforcement of this section may be taken or threatened against
any person by this state, a political subdivision of this state, a prosecut-
ing attorney, or an executive or administrative officer or employee of this
state or a political subdivision of this state.
(6) (14) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this state, a state
official, or a prosecuting attorney may not intervene in an action brought
under this section. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person de-
scribed in this subsection from filing an amicus curiae brief in the action.
(7) (15) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect any familial
rights or responsibilities or any proceedings conducted under Idaho law.
(8) (16) In an action brought under this section, a court may not award
compensatory or punitive damages if a person demonstrates that the person
paid, or has been ordered to pay, compensatory or punitive damages, respec-
tively, in a previous civil action for that particular violation of this
chapter.
(9) (17) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a civil action
may not be brought under this section by a person who, through an act of rape,
sexual assault, incest, or other criminal conduct, impregnated the pregnant
woman seeking an abortion in violation of this chapter.
(10) (18) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the following
shall not be defenses to an action brought under this section:
(a) That the pregnant woman or, if the pregnant woman is a minor, a par-
ent or guardian consented to an unlawful abortion;
(b) Ignorance or mistake of law;
(c) A person's belief that any provision of this section is or was un-
constitutional;
(d) A person's reliance on a state or federal court decision that is not
binding on the court in which the action has been brought;
(e) Non-mutual issue preclusion or non-mutual claim preclusion;
(f) Contributory or comparative negligence;
(g) Assumption of risk; or


(h) A claim that an action brought under the this section will violate a
constitutional right of a third party.
(11) (19) Notwithstanding Except as provided in subsection (10) of this
section and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a court may:
(a) Not award attorney's fees or costs to a person subject to an ac-
tion brought under this section, unless the action is frivolous, with-
out foundation, or brought in bad faith or for the sole reason for delay;
(b) Not award attorney's fees or costs to a person who prevails in
challenging the constitutionality of this section under state law, un-
less the defense of this section is frivolous, without foundation, or
brought in bad faith or for the sole reason for delay; and
(c) Award attorney's fees or costs to a person who prevails in defending
the constitutionality of this section under state law, even though the
challenge to the constitutionality of this section was not frivolous,
without foundation, or brought in bad faith or for the sole reason for
delay.
(12) (20) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to im-
pose liability on speech or conduct protected by the first amendment of the
United States constitution or by section 9, article I of the constitution of
the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.